District of Columbia statutes.
8-906

Rules.

The Mayor is authorized to promulgate regulations necessary to implement and enforce this chapter in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

May 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-117, § 7, 41 DCR 524

History

Condominium and cooperative trash collection tax credit, computation of tax, annual adjustment, limitations, see § 47-872.
Condominium and cooperative trash collection tax credit, cooperative housing associations, see § 47-873.
Solid waste facilities, required environmental impact statements, see § 8-109.11.

Cross References